nb: Hårtapstype: Alopecia areata; Mannlig hårtap; Telogen effluvium; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de perda de cabelo: Alopecia areata; Calvície masculina; Eflúvio telógeno; Outro
hu: Hajhullás típusa: Alopecia areata; Férfi kopaszodás; Telogen effluvium; Egyéb
ko: 탈모 유형: 원형 탈모; 남성형 탈모; 휴지기 탈모; 기타
zh-TW: 脫髮類型: 斑禿; 男性型態性禿髮; 休止期脫髮; 其他
fr: Type de perte de cheveux: Alopecia areata; Calvitie masculine; Effluvium télogène; Autre
th: ประเภทผมร่วง: ผมร่วงเป็นหย่อม; ศีรษะล้านแบบชาย; ผมร่วงเฉียบพลัน; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип косопад: Алопеция ареата; Плешивост при мъжете; Телогенен ефлувиум; Други
pl: Typ wypadania włosów: Łysienie plackowate; Łysienie deseniowe; Łysienie telogenowe; Inne
zh-CN: 脱发类型: 斑秃; 男性型秃发; 休止期脱发; 其他
fi: Hiustenlähtötyyppi: Alopecia areata; Miestyyppinen kaljuuntuminen; Telogeeninen hiustenlähtö; Muu
en: Hair loss type: Alopecia areata; Male pattern baldness; Telogen effluvium; Other
ru: Тип выпадения волос: Очаговая алопеция; Облысение по мужскому типу; Телогеновая алопеция; Другое
da: Hårtabstype: Alopecia areata; Mandlig pletskaldethed; Telogen effluvium; Andet
sv: Typ av håravfall: Alopecia areata; Manligt håravfall; Telogen effluvium; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de perda de cabelo: Alopecia areata; Calvície masculina; Deflúvio telogénico; Outro
nl: Haaruitvalstype: Alopecia areata; Kaalheid bij mannen; Telogeen effluvium; Andere
ro-RO: Tip cădere păr: Alopecia areata; Chelie de tip masculin; Efluviu telogen; Altele
lt-LT: Plaukų slinkimo tipas: Žiedinė alopecija; Vyriško tipo plikimas; Difuzinė alopecija; Kita
el: Τύπος τριχόπτωσης: Γυροειδής αλωπεκία; Ανδρική φαλάκρα; Τελογενής τριχόπτωση; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ vypadávania vlasov: Alopécia areata; Mužská plešatosť; Telogénne deflúvium; Iné
it: Causa della perdita dei capelli: Alopecia areata; Calvizie maschile; Telogen effluvium; Altro
ja: 脱毛のタイプ: 円形脱毛症; 男性型脱毛症; 休止期脱毛症; その他
cs: Důvod vypadávání vlasů: Alopecia areata; Mužská plešatost; Telogen effluvium; Jiné
de: Haarausfalltyp: Kreisrunder Haarausfall; Haarausfall bei Männern; Telogen Effluvium; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Vrsta opadanja kose: Alopecija areata; Muška ćelavost; Telogeni efluvij; Ostalo
vi: Loại rụng tóc: Rụng tóc từng mảng; Kiểu hói nam; Rụng tóc giai đoạn ở giai đoạn ngừng phát triển của tóc; Khác
tr: Saç Dökülmesi Türü: Alopesi Areata; Erkek tipi kellik; Telojen akıntı; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta izpadanja las: Alopecija areata; Moška plešavost; Telogen effluvium; Drugo
es: Tipo de pérdida de cabello: Alopecia areata; Calvicie masculina; Efluvio telógeno; Otros